Illinois, session 104th, SB3579.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Sections 8-205 and 9-210.5 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/8-205)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 8-205)7    Sec. 8-205. Termination of a utility service. 8    (a) Termination of gas and electric utility service to all 9residential users, including all tenants of mastermetered 10apartment buildings, for nonpayment of bills, where gas or 11electricity is used as the only source of space heating or to 12control or operate the only space heating equipment at the 13residence is prohibited:14        (1) on any day when the National Weather Service 15    forecast for the following 24 hours covering the area of 16    the utility in which the residence is located includes a 17    forecast that the temperature will be 32 degrees 18    Fahrenheit or below; or19        (2) on any day preceding a holiday or a weekend when 20    such a forecast indicated that the temperature will be 32 21    degrees Fahrenheit or below during the holiday or weekend.22    (b) If gas or electricity is used as the only source of 23space cooling or to control or operate the only space cooling   SB3579- 2 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1equipment at a residence, then a utility may not terminate gas 2or electric utility service to a residential user, including 3all tenants of mastermetered apartment buildings, for 4nonpayment of bills:5        (1) on any day when the National Weather Service 6    forecast for the following 24 hours covering the area of 7    the utility in which the residence is located includes a 8    forecast that the temperature will be 90 degrees 9    Fahrenheit or above;10        (2) on any day preceding a holiday or weekend when the 11    National Weather Service for the following 24 hours 12    covering the area of the utility in which the residence is 13    located includes a forecast that the temperature will be 14    90 degrees Fahrenheit or above during the holiday or 15    weekend; or16        (3) when the National Weather Service issues an 17    excessive heat watch, heat advisory, or excessive heat 18    warning covering the area of the utility in which the 19    residence is located. 20    (c) Termination of water utility service to a residential 21user, including a tenant of a mastermetered apartment 22building, for nonpayment of bills is prohibited: 23        (1) on any day when the National Weather Service 24    forecast for the following 6 days covering the area of the 25    utility in which the residence is located includes a 26    forecast that the temperature will be 32 degrees   SB3579- 3 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1    Fahrenheit or below; 2        (2) on any day when the National Weather Service 3    forecast for the following 6 days covering the area of the 4    utility in which the residence is located includes a 5    forecast that the temperature will be 90 degrees 6    Fahrenheit or above; or 7        (3) when the National Weather Service issues an 8    excessive heat watch, excessive heat warning, or heat 9    advisory covering the area of the utility in which the 10    residence is located. 11(Source: P.A. 103-19, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 12    (220 ILCS 5/9-210.5)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on June 1, 2028)14    Sec. 9-210.5. Valuation of water and sewer utilities. 15    (a) In this Section:16        "Disinterested" means that the person directly 17    involved (1) is not a director, officer, or an employee of 18    the large public utility or the water or sewer utility or 19    its direct affiliates or subsidiaries for at least 12 20    months before becoming engaged under this Section; (2) 21    shall not derive a material financial benefit from the 22    sale of the water or sewer utility other than fees for 23    services rendered, and (3) shall not have a member of the 24    person's immediate family, including a spouse, parents or 25    spouse's parents, children or spouses of children, or   SB3579- 4 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1    siblings and their spouses or children, be a director, 2    officer, or employee of either the large public utility or 3    water or sewer utility or the water or sewer utility or its 4    direct affiliates or subsidiaries for at least 12 months 5    before becoming engaged under this Section or receive a 6    material financial benefit from the sale of the water or 7    sewer utility other than fees for services rendered.8        "District" means a service area of a large public 9    utility whose customers are subject to the same rate 10    tariff.11        "Large public utility" means an investor-owned public 12    utility that:13            (1) is subject to regulation by the Illinois 14        Commerce Commission under this Act;15            (2) regularly provides water or sewer service to 16        more than 15,000 customer connections;17            (3) provides safe and adequate service; and18            (4) is not a water or sewer utility as defined in 19        this subsection (a).20        "Next rate case" means a large public utility's first 21    general rate case after the date the large public utility 22    acquires the water or sewer utility where the acquired 23    water or sewer utility's cost of service is considered as 24    part of determining the large public utility's resulting 25    rates.26        "Prior rate case" means a large public utility's   SB3579- 5 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1    general rate case resulting in the rates in effect for the 2    large public utility at the time it acquires the water or 3    sewer utility.4        "Utility service source" means the water or sewer 5    utility or large public utility from which the customer 6    receives its utility service type.7        "Utility service type" means water utility service or 8    sewer utility service or water and sewer utility service.9        "Water or sewer utility" means any of the following:10            (1) a public utility that regularly provides water 11        or sewer service to 6,000 or fewer customer 12        connections;13            (2) a water district, including, but not limited 14        to, a public water district, water service district, 15        or surface water protection district, or a sewer 16        district of any kind established as a special district 17        under the laws of this State that regularly provides 18        water or sewer service;19            (3) a waterworks system or sewerage system 20        established under the Township Code that regularly 21        provides water or sewer service; or22            (4) a water system or sewer system owned by a 23        municipality that regularly provides water or sewer 24        service; and25            (5) any other entity that is not a public utility 26        that regularly provides water or sewer service.  SB3579- 6 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, a 2large public utility that acquires a water or sewer utility 3may request that the Commission use, and, if so requested, the 4Commission shall use, the procedures set forth under this 5Section to establish the ratemaking rate base of that water or 6sewer utility at the time when it is acquired by the large 7public utility.8    (c) If a large public utility elects the procedures under 9this Section to establish the rate base of a water or sewer 10utility that it is acquiring, then 3 appraisals shall be 11performed. The average of these 3 appraisals shall represent 12the fair market value of the water or sewer utility that is 13being acquired. The appraisals shall be performed by 3 14appraisers approved by the Commission's Executive Director or 15designee and engaged by either the water or sewer utility 16being acquired or by the large public utility. Each appraiser 17shall be engaged on reasonable terms approved by the 18Commission. Each appraiser shall be a disinterested person 19licensed as a State certified general real estate appraiser 20under the Real Estate Appraiser Licensing Act of 2002.21    Each appraiser shall:22        (1) be sworn to determine the fair market value of the 23    water or sewer utility by establishing the amount for 24    which the water or sewer utility would be sold in a 25    voluntary transaction between a willing buyer and willing 26    seller under no obligation to buy or sell;  SB3579- 7 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1        (2) determine fair market value in compliance with the 2    Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice;3        (3) engage one disinterested engineer who is licensed 4    in this State, and who may be the same engineer that is 5    engaged by the other appraisers, to prepare an assessment 6    of the tangible assets of the water or sewer utility, 7    which is to be incorporated into the appraisal under the 8    cost approach;9        (4) request from the manager of the Accounting 10    Department, if the water or sewer utility is a public 11    utility that is regulated by the Commission, a list of 12    investments made by the water or sewer utility that had 13    been disallowed previously and that shall be excluded from 14    the calculation of the large public utility's rate base in 15    its next rate case; and 16        (5) return their appraisal, in writing, to the water 17    or sewer utility and large public utility in a reasonable 18    and timely manner.19    If the appraiser cannot engage an engineer, as described 20in paragraph (3) of this subsection (c), within 30 days after 21the appraiser is engaged, then the Commission's Executive 22Director or designee shall recommend the engineer the 23appraiser should engage. The Commission's Executive Director 24or designee shall provide his or her recommendation within 30 25days after he or she is officially notified of the appraiser's 26failure to engage an engineer and the appraiser shall promptly   SB3579- 8 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1work to engage the recommended engineer. If the appraiser is 2unable to negotiate reasonable engagement terms with the 3recommended engineer within 15 days after the recommendation 4by the Commission's Executive Director or designee, then the 5appraiser shall notify the Commission's Executive Director or 6designee and the process shall be repeated until an engineer 7is successfully engaged.8    (d) The lesser of (i) the purchase price or (ii) the fair 9market value determined under subsection (c) of this Section 10shall constitute the rate base associated with the water or 11sewer utility as acquired by and incorporated into the rate 12base of the district designated by the acquiring large public 13utility under this Section, subject to any adjustments that 14the Commission deems necessary to ensure such rate base 15reflects prudent and useful investments in the provision of 16public utility service. The reasonable transaction and closing 17costs incurred by the large public utility shall be treated 18consistent with the applicable accounting standards under this 19Act. The total amount of all of the appraisers' fees to be 20included in the transaction and closing costs shall not exceed 21the greater of $15,000 or 5% of the appraised value of the 22water or sewer utility being acquired. This rate base 23treatment shall not be deemed to violate this Act, including, 24but not limited to, any Sections in Articles VIII and IX of 25this Act that might be affected by this Section. Any 26acquisition of a water or sewer utility that affects the   SB3579- 9 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1cumulative base rates of the large public utility's existing 2ratepayers in the tariff group into which the water or sewer 3utility is to be combined by less than (1) 2.5% at the time of 4the acquisition for any single acquisition completed under 5this Section or (2) 5% for all acquisitions completed under 6this Section before the Commission's final order in the next 7rate case shall not be deemed to violate Section 7-204 or any 8other provision of this Act.9    In the Commission's order that approves the large public 10utility's acquisition of the water or sewer utility, the 11Commission shall issue its decision establishing (1) the 12ratemaking rate base of the water or sewer utility; (2) the 13district or tariff group with which the water or sewer utility 14shall be combined for ratemaking purposes, if such combination 15has been proposed by the large public utility; and (3) the 16rates to be charged to customers in the water or sewer utility.17    (e) If the water or sewer utility being acquired is owned 18by the State or any political subdivision thereof, then the 19water or sewer utility must inform the public of the terms of 20its acquisition by the large public utility by (1) holding a 21public meeting prior to the acquisition and (2) causing to be 22published, in a newspaper of general circulation in the area 23that the water or sewer utility operates, a notice setting 24forth the terms of its acquisition by the large public utility 25and options that shall be available to assist customers to pay 26their bills after the acquisition.   SB3579- 10 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1    At the election next following the public meeting and 2notice required under this subsection (e), a referendum, 3subject to the requirements of Section 16-7 of the Election 4Code, shall be placed on the ballot for all electors within the 5area where the water or sewer utility operates in 6substantially the following form: 7        May the (name of large public utility) acquire the 8    (name of water or sewer utility) under the terms of 9    acquisition as published in (name of newspaper) on (date)? 10The votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No". 11    If a majority of the electors voting on the referendum 12within the service area of the water or sewer utility vote in 13favor of the referendum, then the acquisition may continue as 14provided in this Section. If less than a majority of the 15electors voting on the referendum within the service area of 16the water or sewer utility vote in favor of the referendum, the 17Commission shall deny the large public utility's acquisition 18of the water or sewer utility. 19    (f) The large public utility may recommend the district or 20tariff group of which the water or sewer utility shall, for 21ratemaking purposes, become a part after the acquisition, or 22may recommend a lesser rate for the water or sewer utility. If 23the large public utility recommends a lesser rate, it shall 24submit to the Commission its proposed rate schedule and the 25proposed final tariff group for the acquired water or sewer 26utility. The Commission's approved district or tariff group or   SB3579- 11 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1rates shall be consistent with the large public utility's 2recommendation, unless such recommendation can be shown to be 3contrary to the public interest.4    (g) From the date of acquisition until the date that new 5rates are effective in the acquiring large public utility's 6next rate case, the customers of the acquired water or sewer 7utility shall pay the approved then-existing rates of the 8district or tariff group as ordered by the Commission, or some 9lesser rates as recommended by the large public utility and 10approved by the Commission under subsection (f); provided, 11that, if the application of such rates of the large public 12utility to customers of the acquired water or sewer utility 13using 54,000 gallons annually results in an increase to the 14total annual bill of customers of the acquired water or sewer 15utility, exclusive of fire service or related charges, then 16the large public utility's rates charged to the customers of 17the acquired water or sewer utility shall be uniformly 18reduced, if any reduction is required, by the percent that 19results in the total annual bill, exclusive of fire services 20or related charges, for the customers of the acquired water or 21sewer utility using 54,000 gallons being equal to 1.5% of the 22latest median household income as reported by the United 23States Census Bureau for the most applicable community or 24county. For each customer of the water or sewer utility with 25potable water usage values that cannot be reasonably obtained, 26a value of 4,500 gallons per month shall be assigned. These   SB3579- 12 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1rates shall not be deemed to violate this Act including, but 2not limited to, Section 9-101 and any other applicable 3Sections in Articles VIII and IX of this Act. The Commission 4shall issue its decision establishing the rates effective for 5the water or sewer utility immediately following an 6acquisition in its order approving the acquisition.7    (h) In the acquiring large public utility's next rate 8case, the water or sewer utility and the district or tariff 9group ordered by the Commission and their costs of service may 10be combined under the same rate tariff. This rate tariff shall 11be based on allocation of costs of service of the acquired 12water or sewer utility and the large public utility's district 13or tariff group ordered by the Commission and utilizing a rate 14design that does not distinguish among customers on the basis 15of utility service source or type. This rate tariff shall not 16be deemed to violate this Act including, but not limited to, 17Section 9-101 of this Act. In the acquiring large public 18utility's 2 rate cases after an acquisition, but in no 19subsequent rate case, the large public utility may file a rate 20tariff for a water or sewer utility acquired under this 21Section that establishes lesser rates than the district or 22tariff group into which the water or sewer utility is to be 23combined. Those lesser rates shall not be deemed to violate 24Section 7-204 or any other provision of this Act if they affect 25the cumulative base rates of the large public utility's 26existing rate payers in the district or tariff by less than   SB3579- 13 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b12.5%. 2    (i) Any post-acquisition improvements made by the large 3public utility in the water or sewer utility shall accrue a 4cost for financing set at the large public utility's 5determined rate for allowance for funds used during 6construction, inclusive of the debt, equity, and income tax 7gross up components, after the date on which the expenditure 8was incurred by the large public utility until the investment 9has been in service for a 4-year period or, if sooner, until 10the time the rates are implemented in the large public 11utility's next rate case.12    Any post-acquisition improvements made by the large public 13utility in the water or sewer utility shall not be depreciated 14for ratemaking purposes from the date on which the expenditure 15was incurred by the large public utility until the investment 16has been in service for a 4-year period or, if sooner, until 17the time the rates are implemented in the large public 18utility's next rate case.19    (j) This Section shall be exclusively applied to large 20public utilities in the voluntary and mutually agreeable 21acquisition of water or sewer utilities. Any petitions filed 22with the Commission related to the acquisitions described in 23this Section, including petitions seeking approvals or 24certificates required by this Act, shall be deemed approved 25unless the Commission issues its final order within 11 months 26after the date the large public utility filed its initial   SB3579- 14 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1petition. This Section shall only apply to utilities providing 2water or sewer service and shall not be construed in any manner 3to apply to electric corporations, natural gas corporations, 4or any other utility subject to this Act.5    (k) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a party from 6declining to proceed with an acquisition or be deemed as 7establishing the final purchase price of an acquisition.8    (l) In the Commission's order that approves the large 9utility's acquisition of the water or sewer utility, the 10Commission shall address each aspect of the acquisition 11transaction for which approval is required under the Act. 12    (m) Any contractor or subcontractor that performs work on 13a water or sewer utility acquired by a large public utility 14under this Section shall be a responsible bidder as described 15in Section 30-22 of the Illinois Procurement Code. The 16contractor or subcontractor shall submit evidence of meeting 17the requirements to be a responsible bidder as described in 18Section 30-22 to the water or sewer utility. Any new water or 19sewer facility built as a result of the acquisition shall 20require the contractor to enter into a project labor 21agreement. The large public utility acquiring the water or 22sewer utility shall offer employee positions to qualified 23employees of the acquired water or sewer utility. 24    (n) This Section is repealed on June 1, 2028. 25(Source: P.A. 102-149, eff. 1-1-22.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB3579- 15 -LRB104 16285 AAS 29670 b1becoming law.